South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S774.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 40, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-40-245. (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Education shall reduce the State Aid to Classrooms distribution to school districts in an amount equal to the district's local revenue per pupil, excluding revenues of local bond issues, for the prior fiscal year as determined by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office, for each student in the district that attends a South Carolina public charter school authorized by the South Carolina Public Charter School District or an institution of higher learning. The reduction must be made in equal installments. (B) From the funds withheld pursuant to subsection (A), the Department of Education shall add to the funds distributed to the South Carolina Public Charter School District and any institution of higher learning authorizing a public charter school the same local revenue per pupil for each student attending the public charter school. The addition must be made in equal installments. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----